Hawaii statutes.
§10-11 Salary of the administrator.
The salary of the administrator shall be established by the board; provided
that such salary shall not exceed the salary of department heads or executive
officers established by law. The administrator shall be included in any
benefit program generally applicable to officers and employees of the State. [L
1979, c 196, pt of §2; am L 1981, c 130, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next